Louisiana, session 2026, SB484.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:2048.51(C)(1) and (G)(1)(b)(i), the introductory paragraph of
3128.1(A), 3128.1(B), and (C), 3134, 3138(A), (B), and (E), 3138.5(B)(1), (D)(1), (2), the
Page 1 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
introductory paragraph of (D)(4), 3138.5(D)(4)(f), and (5), and (E), and 3138.9(A)(3) and
(5), (B)(1) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:3128.1(D), 3138(G), and
3454(E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2048.51. Louisiana Health Works Commission; creation; membership;
compensation; staff and facilities; powers and duties; data collection
and reporting
* * *
C. The following shall serve as members of the Louisiana Health Works
Commission:
(1) The secretary of Louisiana Works, or his designee, who shall serve as co-
chair of the commission.
* * *
G. The Louisiana Health Works Commission shall have the following
committees:
(1)(a) * * *
(b) The executive committee shall:
(i) Elect the chairperson co-chair of the commission. The chair of the
Nursing Supply and Demand Committee shall serve as the vice chair of the
commission.
* * *
§3128.1. Power to survey, evaluate, and implement incubator facilities on state
college and university campuses
A. The Board of Regents Each management board of each public
postsecondary education system shall conduct a survey of state colleges and
universities for the purpose of establishing incubator facilities small business
incubators, as defined in R.S. 51:1122(4) R.S. 51:2322, on qualified campuses. In
order to complete such study, the each management board shall establish criteria
for evaluation of institutions which shall include, but not be limited to the following
information:
* * *
Page 2 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
B. The Each management board shall use the criteria established pursuant
to Subsection A in order to evaluate the potential for incubator facilities on campuses
and recommend such facilities on qualified campuses.
C. The Each management board shall report criteria established, data
developed, and other relevant information and shall make recommendations for
implementation of incubator facilities to the governor, the speaker of the House of
Representatives, the president of the Senate, the chairmen of the House Committee
on Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce, the chairman of the Small
Business Development Corporation, and the secretary of Louisiana Economic
Development pursuant to its study no later than January 1, 1987.
D. For purposes of this Section, "management board" means a
governing board of a public postsecondary education institution that is
responsible for supervising the day-to-day operations of each institution. Article
VIII of the Constitution of Louisiana provides that the management boards are
the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and Agricultural and
Mechanical College, the Board of Supervisors for the University of Louisiana
System, the Board of Supervisors of Southern University and Agricultural and
Mechanical College, and the Board of Supervisors of Community and Technical
Colleges.
* * *
§3134. Accountability Financial accountability in higher education; legislative
intent; definitions; reporting forms uniform fiscal policy;
administrative reporting; early warning metrics; corrective
actions
A.(1) It is the intent of the legislature that an to establish and implement
comprehensive financial accountability process be established and implemented to
provide for the systematic, ongoing evaluation of quality and effectiveness in the
framework for public institutions of higher education in Louisiana that may be used
to initiate curriculum, programmatic, funding, policy, or planning changes in higher
education that provides for the systematic and ongoing evaluation of fiscal
Page 3 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
health, operational efficiency, and institutional effectiveness.
(2) It is further the intent of the legislature that the such accountability
process monitor performance at the institutional level in each of the major areas of
research, student learning and development, faculty development and quality, and
to assure that progress toward providing excellent educational programming and
opportunities consistent with the institutional role, scope, and mission of each of the
public institutions of higher education is being made and funded framework include
the continuous monitoring and evaluation of institutional fiscal performance,
including the budgeting, allocation, expenditure, and stewardship of public
funds at the institutional level. The framework shall ensure that public funds
are expended in a manner that demonstrates efficiency, effectiveness, and
measurable return on investment, and that funding decisions are directly tied
to the achievement of defined performance outcomes consistent with the role,
scope, and mission of each public institution of higher education.
B.(1) The accountability process shall be developed by the Board of Regents
in a collaborative effort involving each higher education management board shall
establish a uniform fiscal policy including an institutional cash balance policy,
to be adopted by each public postsecondary education management board no
later than December 31, 2026.
(2) The policy shall require each public postsecondary education
institution to submit an institutional quarterly financial report to its respective
public postsecondary education management board.
(3) Each institutional quarterly financial report shall include, at a
minimum:
(a) Quarterly revenues and expenditures, including comparisons to
budgeted amounts.
(b) Fund balances, including unrestricted, restricted, athletics, and
auxiliary funds.
(c) Cash flow and liquidity metrics.
(d) Outstanding debt obligations and material changes thereto.
Page 4 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
(e) Actual and quarterly projected tuition and fee revenue.
(f) Account receivable balances.
(g) Identification of actual or projected deficits or financial risks.
(h) Campus action plans as needed.
(i) Any additional information as required by the Board of Regents.
(4) Institutional quarterly financial reports shall be submitted to the
management board no later than fifteen days after the close of each fiscal
quarter. Management boards shall submit compiled reports to the Board of
Regents no later than thirty days after the close of each fiscal quarter.
(5) Each management board shall review and compile its institutional
quarterly financial reports and submit a system level quarterly financial report,
inclusive of all institutions under its jurisdiction, to the Board of Regents.
Systems shall identify institutions in financial distress and shall provide a
corrective action plan and a timeline to address the fiscal challenges of the
distressed institution.
(6) Each management board shall adopt policies to ensure timely and
accurate submission of reports required pursuant to this Section.
(7) Failure to timely submit required reports shall result in a designation
of noncompliance. The Board of Regents shall provide written notice of
noncompliance to the commissioner of administration, the president of the
Senate, the speaker of the House of Representatives, the House Committee on
Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Finance.
C.(1) The Board of Regents shall develop and implement a fiscal early
warning system to monitor the financial condition of each public postsecondary
education institution. be the authorized agency for administration, implementation,
monitoring, and evaluation of the accountability process and is authorized to, but is
not limited to, the following:
(a) Adopt the appropriate measures, necessary standard definitions, and
program guidelines to implement an accountability process for public institutions of
higher education.
Page 5 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
(b) Identify institutional and systemwide performance standards and
performance goals.
(c) Develop appropriate reporting procedures and formats for use by the
institutions in reporting data.
(d) Develop a process for allocating funding in an objective and measurable
manner designed to assure adequate resources are available to achieve excellent
educational programming and opportunity consistent with each institution's role,
scope, and mission and to provide incentive and reward for excellence in institutional
performance.
(e) Submit an annual report to the governor and to the Committees on
Education of the Senate and the House of Representatives beginning in 1997.
(2) The Board of Regents shall adopt such rules and regulations as may be
necessary in implementing this Section, which shall include but shall not be limited
to the final recommendations of the Accountability in Public Higher Education
Advisory Committee The warning system shall utilize the quarterly financial
reports submitted pursuant to this Section, together with any additional data,
including system internal audit reports required by the Board of Regents, to
identify conditions of financial distress, structural deficit, and risk of financial
insolvency at the earliest practicable stage.
(3) The Board of Regents shall establish uniform financial metrics and
risk indicators, including but not limited to:
(a) Structural deficits exceeding three percent of an institution's
operating budget.
(b) Declines in cash on hand below two months of operating expenses.
(c) Negative cash flow.
(d) Increasing debt burden or unsustainable debt service ratios.
(e) Enrollment declines materially affecting revenue.
(f) Increasing accounts receivable balance.
D.(1) The Board of Regents may require that every public higher education
institution submit to it, at a time it specifies, an annual accountability report of
Page 6 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
institutional effectiveness to include the data as it may determine shall require each
management board to develop and implement a detailed corrective action plan
in response to an institution identified as being in fiscal distress. The corrective
action plan should be submitted to the Board of Regents within ninety days of
the institution being deemed in distress to ensure timely and effective fiduciary
and budgetary measures.
(2) If a management board fails to take corrective action as required
pursuant to this Subsection, the Board of Regents shall refer the matter to the
office of inspector general for review.
E.(1) The provisions of this Section shall be mandatory only to the extent that
the necessary funds are appropriated to the Board of Regents for this purpose The
Louisiana Board of Regents shall annually submit a written report to the House
Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Finance, and the
Division of Administration not later than sixty days prior to the beginning of the
legislative session.
(2) The report shall include information provided for in Paragraphs
(B)(3) and (D)(1) of this Section.
* * *
§3138. Louisiana common application; development; implementation
A.(1)(a) The Board of Regents Each management board of each public
postsecondary education system, in collaboration with the each public
postsecondary education management boards institution, the chairman of the Senate
Committee on Education or his designee, and the chairman of the House Committee
on Education or his designee, shall provide for the development and implementation
of a common application whereby Louisiana residents and nonresidents may apply
to any public college and university in the state system. Except as provided in R.S.
17:3152, such application shall not include questions pertaining to an applicant's
criminal history.
(b) When developing the implementation plan for the common application,
consideration shall be given to best practices for successful implementation,
Page 7 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
implementation costs, development and maintenance of a website to facilitate the
common application process, and the duties and responsibilities of the Board of
Regents and the postsecondary education systems and institutions.
(2) Regionally accredited independent colleges and universities that are
members of the Louisiana Association of Independent Colleges and Universities may
also utilize the a Louisiana common application developed by any management
board of a public postsecondary education system.
B. Each public college and university shall accept the Louisiana common
application developed by its management board, which a student may complete
one time and submit to as many institutions as he wishes to apply. Applications may
be submitted electronically or in a paper format, as specified by the individual
postsecondary institution.
* * *
E. The Louisiana common application shall be developed by each
management board and be fully implemented and available to students applying
for admission for the 2016-2017 2026-2027 academic year.
* * *
G. For purposes of this Section, "management board" shall have the
same meaning as R.S. 17:3128.1.
* * *
§3138.5. Purple Star Campus; designation; process; eligibility; applications
* * *
B.(1) The Board of Regents Department of Veterans Affairs shall establish
a process for a postsecondary education institution to be designated as a "Purple Star
Campus".
* * *
D.(1) The Board of Regents Department of Veterans Affairs shall develop
an application process, including time lines for submitting applications, for
institutions that are interested in receiving the designation specified in Paragraph
(B)(1) of this Section.
Page 8 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
(2) The Board of Regents Department of Veterans Affairs shall review each
application and shall submit such applications to the governor along with a written
report that indicates if an institution meets the requirements specified in Subsections
B and C of this Section to receive the initial designation by the governor.
* * *
(4) After receiving the initial designation by the governor and in accordance
with timelines established by the board department, an institution shall submit a
renewal application to the Board of Regents Department of Veterans Affairs prior
to the expiration of a designation and an interim report in each year it is not
submitting a renewal application. Each renewal application and interim report shall
include, at a minimum, all of the following information from the previous year as it
relates to veterans:
* * *
(f) Other military friendly information identified by the Board of Regents
Department of Veterans Affairs.
(5) If the Board of Regents Department of Veterans Affairs determines that
the institution meets the requirements specified in Subsections B and C of this
Section based on its renewal application, the institution shall receive the designation
for that year. If the Board of Regents Department of Veterans Affairs determines
that an institution does not meet the specified requirements, the board department
shall provide written notice to the institution and the institution shall have forty-five
days from receipt of the notice to correct or amend its renewal application. If the
institution does not submit a corrected or amended application or if the corrected or
amended application does not meet the requirements as determined by the board
department, the institution shall not receive the designation for that year.
E. The Board of Regents Department of Veterans Affairs may establish
additional tiers of distinction for the purpose of recognizing higher levels of
excellence demonstrated by institutions that have received the designation provided
for in this Section. If the board department establishes additional tiers, it shall
provide for the criteria for each tier and the associated application process.
Page 9 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
* * *
§3138.9. Louisiana Cybersecurity Talent Initiative Fund; Cybersecurity Education
Management Council
A.(1) * * *
(3) Monies in the fund shall be appropriated to the Board of Regents
Louisiana Works to be distributed to public postsecondary education institutions.
* * *
(5) Funding shall be distributed by the Board of Regents Louisiana Works
to the public postsecondary education management boards only upon the certification
by such a board, on behalf of the receiving institution, that a match of no less than
twenty-five percent of the amount of funding to be distributed has been guaranteed
by a private entity. The certification shall detail the type of private match to be
provided, which may include but is not limited to cash; in-kind donations of
technology, personnel, construction materials, facility modification, or corporeal
property; internships; scholarships; sponsorship of staff or faculty; or faculty
endowment.
* * *
B.(1) The Cybersecurity Education Management Council, referred to in this
Section as the "council", is hereby created under the auspices of the Board of
Regents Louisiana Works for the purpose of advising and making recommendations
to the board with respect to distributions from the fund.
* * *
C. The Board of Regents annually Louisiana Works shall submit a report
to the Senate Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Finance, the House
Committee on Education, and the House Committee on Appropriations, on an
annual basis. The report shall include the distribution method, the list of degree and
certificate programs upon which the distribution is based, the final distribution
amounts, the number of jobs created as a result of the distribution, and the method
and data used to determine the reported number of jobs created. Each public
postsecondary education management board shall report to the Board of Regents
Page 10 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
Louisiana Works the information necessary for the Board of Regents Louisiana
Works to satisfy the requirements of this Subsection.
* * *
§3454. Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium for Research and Education;
governance, funding
* * *
E.(1) There is hereby created the Louisiana Marine Consortium
Efficiency and Research Competitiveness Commission, hereinafter referred to
as the "commission", to study and make recommendations regarding the
operations, governance, administration, funding structure, and research
competitiveness of the Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium for Research
and Education.
(2) The purpose of the commission shall be to evaluate methods and
opportunities to do all of the following:
(a) Improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the consortium.
(b) Increase collaboration among public and private postsecondary
education institutions participating in the consortium.
(c) Maximize the consortium's ability to obtain federal, private, and
other external research grants and funding.
(d) Increase equitable participation in consortium research opportunities
by member institutions.
(e) Identify opportunities to reduce administrative duplication and
improve operational coordination among participating institutions.
(f) Strengthen Louisiana's competitiveness for marine, coastal,
environmental, fisheries, and related scientific research funding.
(3) The commission shall be composed of the following voting members:
(a) The president of the Louisiana State University System, or his
designee.
(b) The president of the Southern University System, or his designee.
(c) The president of the University of Louisiana System, or his designee.
Page 11 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
(d) The president of the Louisiana Community and Technical College
System, or his designee.
(e) One member appointed to represent the Louisiana Association of
Independent Colleges and Universities, who shall be the president of Tulane
University, or his designee.
(4) The executive director of the consortium shall serve as a nonvoting
ex officio member of the commission and shall serve as secretary to the
commission.
(5) The members of the commission shall elect a chairman from among
its voting members.
(6) The commission shall meet as necessary and may request
information, data, reports, and assistance from the consortium and
participating institutions in carrying out its duties.
(7) The executive director, as secretary to the commission, shall prepare
and submit the written report of the commission as required by Paragraph (8)
of this Subsection.
(8) No later than January 2, 2027, the commission shall submit its
written report, in accordance with R.S. 24:771 and 772, to the Senate
Committee on Education, the House Committee on Education, the Senate
Committee on Finance, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Board
of Regents regarding its findings and recommendations concerning governance
reforms, administrative efficiencies, collaborative research opportunities, and
strategies to increase federal, private, and external research funding.
(9) The commission shall terminate on January 2, 2027.
Section 2. R.S. 36:309(E)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§309. Transfer of agencies to Louisiana Works
* * *
E. The following agencies are transferred to and hereafter shall be within
Louisiana Works and shall perform and exercise their powers, duties, functions, and
responsibilities as provided by law:
Page 12 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
* * *
(3) The Cybersecurity Education Management Council (R.S. 17:3138.9).
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 39:128(B)(1) and (4)(a)(i) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§128. Exemptions
* * *
B.(1) Minor repairs, renovation, or construction of buildings or other
facilities or the purchase of land, buildings, or other facilities when the construction
cost or purchase price is less than or equal to one two million dollars, adjusted
annually in accordance with the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics consumer
price index for all urban consumers as published in January of each year, may be
undertaken by or on the campus of a state college, university, higher education
facility, or consortium without being included in the capital outlay budget but shall
be subject to the approval of the Board of Regents and the appropriate
postsecondary management board, or any successor. A state college, university,
higher education facility, or consortium may not incur debt to fund any project that
is not included in the capital outlay budget other than a short-term loan not to exceed
one year for the purposes included in this Paragraph. Any short-term loan shall be
issued in accordance with the provisions of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, and shall not constitute or create any debt, liability, or loan of the
credit of or a pledge of the full faith and credit of the state but shall be solely the
obligation of the appropriate governing board or postsecondary education
management board, or any successor. Each postsecondary management board
shall report projects initiated under the provisions of this Section when the
construction cost or purchase price is between two hundred fifty thousand and
two million dollars to the Board of Regents on a monthly basis.
* * *
(4)(a)(i) A university, higher education facility, or consortium shall be
allowed to undertake any new construction, maintenance, or repair project not
Page 13 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
exceeding ten million dollars solely funded from self-generated revenues, grants,
donations, or local or federal funds without being included in the Capital Outlay Bill,
provided that the project is approved by the appropriate governing board or
postsecondary management board; the Board of Regents; the division of
administration, office of facility planning and control; and the Joint Legislative
Committee on the Budget. The office of facility planning and control shall issue the
necessary contracts for the project and shall disburse funds to pay the costs of the
project. The university, higher education facility, or consortium shall remit project
funding to the office of facility planning and control for deposit in the state treasury
at such time as may be deemed necessary by the office of facility planning and
control in order to cover the amount of contracts or other project expenses. Any
surplus of the project funding and any interest earned on the funds shall be refunded
to the university, higher education facility, or consortium by the state treasurer. Each
postsecondary management board shall report projects initiated under the
provisions of this Section to the Board of Regents on a monthly basis.
Section 4. R.S. 42:375.2(A), the introductory paragraph of (B) and (B)(1), (C), and
(D)(3) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 42:375.2(D)(4) is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
§375.2. Agency attrition analysis process, higher education systems
A. The Board of Regents Each management board of each public
postsecondary education system shall establish and implement an agency attrition
analysis process to be used by each institution under each higher education system
to review the historical employee vacancies, relative to authorized table of
organization full and part-time positions funded in whole or in part by the state
general fund, within each agency with a goal to reduce by five percent annually for
three years by an equally proportionate reduction of such positions across all salary
ranges of equal increments, beginning Fiscal Year 2010-2011 2026-2027, the
number of such positions in each higher education system.
B. In implementing the requirements of Subsection A of this Section, the
Board of Regents each management board shall establish a process which requires
Page 14 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 484 ENROLLED
the analysis of the following:
(1) General staffing needs of each higher education system public
postsecondary education institution.
* * *
C. On the first day of the month following the month in which the executive
budget is submitted to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, the Board of
Regents each management board shall provide a written report to the Commission
on Streamlining Government Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget
indicating the state general fund dollar savings achieved as a result of the
implementation of the agency attrition analysis process and the number of vacant
positions eliminated and any other information relating to personnel numbers, costs,
and historical vacancies.
D. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(3) "Management board" shall have the same meaning as R.S. 17:3128.1.
(4) "Vacant position" means any authorized table of organization full or
part-time position of employment for which a budget has been approved and an
appropriation has been made or a transfer of funds effected pursuant to law which
is funded in whole or in part by the state general fund, but which is not filled.
Section 5. R.S. 36:651(F)(6) and (L)(1)(a) are hereby repealed.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 15 of 15
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.